Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:(1) A spousal survivor's residence is exempt from all or a portion of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the provisions of this section.(2) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence that was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of the time of filing. However, any person who sells, transfers, or is displaced from the person's residence may transfer such person's exemption status to a replacement residence, but no claimant may receive an exemption on more than one residence in any year. Moreover, confinement of the person to a hospital, nursing home, assisted living facility, or adult family home does not disqualify the claim of exemption if:(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home, hospital, assisted living facility, or adult family home costs.(3) The person claiming the exemption under this section must have owned, at the time of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, the person must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which the person resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community or state registered domestic partnership or owned by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each spouse or each domestic partner or each cotenant, and any lease for life is deemed a life estate.(4)(a) The amount that the person is exempt from an obligation to pay is calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383.(b) If the person claiming the exemption was retired for two months or more of the assessment year, the combined disposable income of such person must be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months such person was retired by 12.(c) If the income of the person claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment year due to substantial changes that occur in disposable income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable income of such person must be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person after such occurrences by 12.(d) If the income of the person claiming the exemption increases as a result of a cost-of-living adjustment to social security benefits or supplemental security income in an amount that would disqualify the applicant from eligibility, the applicant is not disqualified but instead maintains eligibility.(e) If it is necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection (4), the assessor may require confirming documentation of such income prior to May 31st of the year following application.(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income equal to or less than income threshold 3 is exempt from all excess property taxes, the additional state property tax imposed under RCW 84.52.065(2), and the portion of the regular property tax authorized pursuant to RCW 84.55.050 and approved by the voters, if the legislative authority of the county or city imposing the additional regular property tax identified this exemption in the ordinance placing the RCW 84.55.050 measure on the ballot.(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income equal to or less than income threshold 2 but greater than income threshold 1 is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of $50,000 or 35 percent of the valuation of their residence, but not to exceed $70,000 of the valuation of their residence.(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income equal to or less than income threshold 1 is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of $60,000 or 60 percent of the valuation of their residence.(6)(a) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income equal to or less than income threshold 3, the valuation of the residence is the assessed value of the residence on January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one year because of high income, this same valuation must be used upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon requalification is the assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different residence, the valuation of the different residence is the assessed value of the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.(b) In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the assessment year.(c) This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the property must be added to the value otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair value in the year in which they are made.(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Cotenant" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.383.(b) "Real property" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.383.(c) "Residence" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.383.(d) "Spousal survivor" means:(i) A surviving spouse or domestic partner of a correctional officer or community corrections officer employed with the department of corrections or a correctional or security officer employed with a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020 or a correctional facility created under RCW 70.48.095, who has died as a result of a workplace injury or occupational disease; or(ii) A spousal or domestic partner recipient of a duty-related death benefit from the:(A) Washington state law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, pursuant to RCW 41.26.048;(B) Volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pensions system, pursuant to RCW 41.24.160; or(C) Washington state patrol, pursuant to RCW 43.43.285.Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.385 and 2023 c 147 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or section 1 of this act as now or hereafter amended, may be made and filed at any time during the year for exemption from taxes payable the following year and thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381 continues for no more than six years unless a renewal application is filed as provided in subsection (3) of this section.(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or section 1 of this act must inform the county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 in 1993 and thereafter must file with the county assessor a renewal application not later than December 31st of the year the assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the renewal application. Renewal applications must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.(4) At least once every six years, the county assessor must notify those persons receiving an exemption from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 of the requirement to file a renewal application. The county assessor may also require a renewal application following an amendment of the income requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381.(5) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381 or section 1 of this act, as now or hereafter amended, the claim or exemption must be denied but such denial is subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010 and in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If the applicant had received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the taxes must be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed five years.(6) The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 1 of this act, through communications media, including such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for not reporting a change in status, and availability of further information must be included on or with property tax statements and revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile homes, except rental properties.(7) The department must authorize an option for electronic filing of applications and renewal applications for the exemption under RCW 84.36.381 and section 1 of this act.(8) Beginning August 1, 2023, and by March 1st every third year thereafter, the department must publish updated income thresholds. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded up to the nearest one thousand dollars. If the income threshold adjustment is negative, the income threshold for the prior year continues to apply. The department must adjust income thresholds for each county to reflect the most recent year available of estimated county median household incomes, including preliminary estimates or projections, as published by the office of financial management. For the purposes of this subsection, "county median household income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.383.(9) Beginning with the adjustment made by August 1, 2023, as provided in subsection (8) of this section, and every adjustment thereafter, if an income threshold in a county is not adjusted based on percentage of county median income, then the income threshold must be adjusted based on the growth of the seasonally adjusted consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) for the prior twelve month period as published by the United States bureau of labor statistics. In no case may the adjustment be greater than one percent. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded to the nearest one dollar. If the income threshold adjustment is negative, the income threshold for the prior year continues to apply.Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.387 and 2020 c 209 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all claims for exemption shall be made and signed under oath by the person entitled to the exemption, by his or her attorney-in-fact or in the event the residence of such person is under mortgage or purchase contract requiring accumulation of reserves out of which the holder of the mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate taxes, by such holder or by the owner: PROVIDED, That if a claim for exemption is made by a person living in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such claim shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the exemption and by the authorized agent of such cooperative.(2) If the taxpayer is unable to submit his or her own claim, the claim shall be submitted by a duly authorized agent or by a guardian or other person charged with the care of the person or property of such taxpayer.(3) All claims for exemption and renewal applications shall be accompanied by such documented verification of income as shall be prescribed by rule adopted by the department of revenue.(4) Any person signing a false claim with the intent to defraud or evade the payment of any tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.(5) The tax liability of a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership shall be reduced by the amount of tax exemption to which a claimant residing therein is entitled and such cooperative shall reduce any amount owed by the claimant to the cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or, if no amount be owed, the cooperative shall make payment to the claimant of such exact amount of exemption.(6) A remainderman or other person who would have otherwise paid the tax on real property that is the subject of an exemption granted under RCW 84.36.381 or section 1 of this act for an estate for life shall reduce the amount which would have been payable by the life tenant to the remainderman or other person to the extent of the exemption. If no amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation between these persons, the remainderman or other person shall make payment to the life tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.389 and 1979 ex.s. c 214 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director of the department of revenue shall adopt such rules and regulations and prescribe such forms as may be necessary and appropriate for implementation and administration of this chapter subject to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.(2) The department may conduct such audits of the administration of RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 1 of this act and the claims for exemption filed thereunder as it considers necessary. The powers of the department under chapter 84.08 RCW apply to these audits.(3) Any information or facts concerning confidential income data obtained by the assessor or the department, or their agents or employees, under subsection (2) of this section shall be used only to administer RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 1 of this act. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, absent written consent by the person about whom the information or facts have been obtained, the confidential income data shall not be disclosed by the assessor or the assessor's agents or employees to anyone other than the department or the department's agents or employees nor by the department or the department's agents or employees to anyone other than the assessor or the assessor's agents or employees except in a judicial proceeding pertaining to the taxpayer's entitlement to the tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 1 of this act. Any violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Section 1 of this act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2027 and thereafter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.--- END ---